Washington statutes.
RCW 21.30.810

Construction and purpose.

This chapter may be construed and implemented to effectuate its general purpose to protect investors, to prevent and prosecute illegal and fraudulent schemes involving commodities and to maximize coordination with federal and other states' law and the administration and enforcement thereof.

[ 1986 c 14 s 42.]